Massachusetts, session 194th, H2309.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 39 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014 Official Edition, is hereby 
amended by adding the following new section:- 
Section 1. As used in this act the following words shall, unless the context clearly 
requires otherwise, have the following meanings:- 
“Illegal immigrant”, an individual who is not a United States citizen and who is not 
lawfully present in the United States. 
“Political subdivision”, city, town, or country. 

of 3 8  “Satisfactory immigration status”, immigration status under which an individual who is 
not a United States citizen is lawfully present in this country. 
Section 2. (a) A political subdivision may not enact an ordinance, adopt a resolution, or 
establish a policy that prohibits an employee of that political subdivision from doing any of the 
following: 
1. Inquiring whether an individual who has been lawfully detained or arrested has 
satisfactory immigration status. 
2. With regard to the immigration status of any individual who has been lawfully 
detained or arrested, sending the information to, or requesting or receiving information from, the 
federal government. Such information may include information regarding an individual's place 
of birth, and such information may be maintained by the political subdivision and may be 
exchanged with another political subdivision, another state, and with the federal government. 
3. Assisting or cooperating with a federal immigration officer, including the provision of 
enforcement assistance. 
4. Permitting a federal immigration officer to enter and conduct immigration enforcement 
activities in any building or facility under the control of the political subdivision. 
(b) If a political subdivision has in effect on the effective date of this legislation, an 
ordinance, resolution, or policy that is inconsistent with par. (a), the ordinance, resolution, or 
policy does not apply and may not be enforced. 
Section 3. (a) If the attorney general, a district attorney, or a police chief believes that a 
political subdivision is failing to comply with the requirements of sub. (2) (a), the attorney 

of 3 29 general, or the district attorney or police chief with the appropriate jurisdiction, may file a writ of 
mandamus with the Superior Court, for the county where the alleged failure to comply with sub. 
(2) (a) occurred to compel the noncomplying political subdivision to comply with the 
requirements. 
(b) If the court finds that the political subdivision has failed to comply with sub. (2) (a), 
the court shall notify the Department of Revenue of its finding of noncompliance and the 
Department of Revenue shall reduce the amount unrestricted government aid payments to the 
political subdivision in the following year by one of the following amounts for each day after the 
filing of an action under par. (a) that the political subdivision was noncompliant: 
1. If the population of the political subdivision is less than 10,000, $2,000. 
2. If the population of the political subdivision is at least 10,000 but less than 100,000, 
$5,000. 
3. If the population of the political subdivision is at least 100,000 but less than 250,000, 
$10,000. 
4. If the population of the political subdivision is 250,000 or more, $15,000.